California, session 20252026, AB2254.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1021.5 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:1021.5. (a) On or before January July 1, 2028, the department, in coordination with the California Coastal Commission, shall identify both of the following:(1) Monarch Known monarch butterfly (Danaus plexippus) overwintering habitat sites in the coastal zone.(2) Current local government monarch butterfly overwintering habitat management plans or policies.(b) On or before July 1, 2028, 2029, the department, in coordination with the California Coastal Commission, shall develop and provide guidance on model policies that can be used by a local government for the protection of monarch butterfly overwintering habitat, including habitat restoration and enhancement, to address gaps in habitat protection plans in the coastal zone.(1) (A) Model policies developed pursuant to this subdivision may include, but are not limited to, enforceable habitat management plans with measurable outcomes, local coastal program updates, and other local policies, such as ordinances, for protecting monarch butterflies that are locally enforceable with measurable outcomes.(B) If the department provides guidance on model ordinances pursuant to this paragraph, the department shall adopt the model ordinances as regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(2) The department and the California Coastal Commission, in developing the guidance pursuant to this subdivision, may use existing datasets produced by local governments, organizations focused on the conservation of invertebrates and their habitats, and other relevant entities.(3) (A) The department and the California Coastal Commission shall post the guidance developed pursuant to this subdivision on their internet websites.(B) The guidance document posted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include the information identified pursuant to subdivision (a).(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Coastal zone” has the same meaning as defined in Section 30103 of the Public Resources Code.(2) “Local coastal program” has the same meaning as defined in Section 30108.6 of the Public Resources Code.SEC. 2. Section 30505 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 30504, to read:30505. (a) After the guidance on model policies developed pursuant to Section 1021.5 of the Fish and Game Code is finalized, a local government with a monarch butterfly overwintering habitat site located within their its jurisdiction and the coastal zone, as identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1021.5 of the Fish and Game Code, shall shall, on or before July 1, 2031, develop and implement enforceable monarch butterfly overwintering habitat site protection policies consistent with the guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1021.5 of the Fish and Game Code.(b) A local government shall be encouraged to apply for grants administered pursuant to the Monarch Butterfly and Pollinator Rescue Program established by Section 1374 of the Fish and Game Code if the local government has monarch butterfly overwintering habitat site protection policies that are consistent with subdivision (a) and with the guidelines developed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1374 of the Fish and Game Code. SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.